Vermont, session 2025-2026, H120.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LONG-TERM CARE TRUST FUND; AGENCY OF
ADMINISTRATION; STUDY; REPORT
(a) The Secretary of Administration shall study and design a trust fund
that would provide for long-term care of eligible persons. In particular, the
Secretary shall study the following:
(1) the creation and design of the trust fund based on a social insurance
model, such as Social Security;
(2) a funding plan addressing:
VT LEG #380011 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.120
2025 Page 2 of 3
(A) the collection of funds starting on July 1, 2026 for a minimum
of three years before benefits would be provided; and
(B) the collection of funds from residents of Vermont who have a
Vermont taxable income of over 150 percent of the federal poverty level;
(3) the creation of a governing committee, and a recommended
composition of this committee, that would:
(A) administer the fund;
(B) develop the benefit package and eligibility thresholds based on
capacity to carry out activities of daily living and cognitive challenges; and
(C) develop regulations regarding the portability of benefits for
persons who pay into the system and then leave Vermont;
(4) the viability of persons being eligible for benefits after paying into
the program for at least two years; and
(5) the transfer of fund resources to Medicaid, to be used in providing
long-term care services.
(b) The Secretary may receive assistance from any agency, department,
division, or office and any board or commission of any such entity, or any
independent board or commission, in the Executive Branch of the State.
(c) On or before January 15, 2026, the Secretary shall submit a written
report on its findings to the House Committees on Appropriations, on Human
Services, and on Ways and Means and the Senate Committees on
VT LEG #380011 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.120
2025 Page 3 of 3
Appropriations, on Finance, and on Health and Welfare. The report shall
include any necessary proposed legislation to implement the creation of the
fund.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380011 v.1